Illinois, session 104th, SB2666.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Video Gaming Act is amended by changing 5Section 27 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 40/27)7    Sec. 27. Prohibition of video gaming by political 8subdivision. 9    (a) A municipality may pass an ordinance prohibiting video 10gaming within the corporate limits of the municipality. A 11county board may, for the unincorporated area of the county, 12pass an ordinance prohibiting video gaming within the 13unincorporated area of the county.14    (b) On and after July 1, 2022, a qualified fraternal 15organization that derives its charter from a national 16fraternal organization and a qualified veterans organization 17that derives its charter from a national veterans organization 18shall be eligible to apply to the Board for a license allowing 19video gaming as a licensed fraternal establishment or a 20licensed veterans establishment if the proposed fraternal 21establishment or veterans establishment is located in:22        (1) a municipality having a population of not more 23    than 1,000,000 that has enacted an ordinance prohibiting   SB2666- 2 -LRB104 13874 LNS 26717 b1    video gaming within the corporate limits; or2        (2) a county having a population of not more than 3    1,000,000 that has enacted an ordinance prohibiting video 4    gaming within the unincorporated area of the county.5    If the license is granted by the Board, then the licensed 6fraternal establishment or licensed veterans establishment may 7operate video gaming terminals pursuant to this Act.8    (c) A municipality with a population that is greater than 92,000,000 may not enforce any local ordinance in effect on the 10effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 11Assembly prohibiting the operation of video gaming terminals 12within the corporate limits of the municipality. This 13subsection (c) is a denial and limitation of home rule powers 14and functions under subsection (g) of Section 6 of Article VII 15of the Illinois Constitution. 16(Source: P.A. 102-689, eff. 12-17-21.) 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.